Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1105
Obligation of public power district to convey to municipality; no election necessary; when.

The provisions of section 70-650.01 shall be and remain in full force and effect with reference to the transfer and conveyance of its distribution system by the district as therein required. In those cases in which the municipality shall be operating the distribution system of the district, as provided in sections 70-1102 to 70-1104 at the time of the retirement of the district's bonds as described in section 70-650.01, no election shall be required as a condition of said transfer to the municipality.

Laws 1963, c. 398, § 6, p. 1271.